Washington statutes.
RCW 19.410.020

Adverse licensing action.

Medical professionals licensed by the state of Washington shall not be subject to adverse licensing action for recommending psilocybin therapy services.

[ 2023 c 364 s 9.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: 2023 c 364 ss 1-5, 7, 10, 11, and 13 were vetoed. 2023 c 364 s 13 directed ss 1-5 and 7-11 to be codified in a new chapter in Title 18 RCW, but codification in Title 19 RCW appears to be more appropriate.